Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.012

Chief for a day program.

(1) To promote positive relationships between law enforcement and the citizens of the state of Washington, the Washington state patrol may participate in the chief for a day program. The chief of the Washington state patrol may designate staff who may participate in organizing the event. The Washington state patrol may accept grants of funds and gifts to be utilized in furtherance of this purpose, and may use their public facilities for such purpose. At all times, the participation of the Washington state patrol must comply with chapter 42.52 RCW.

(2) For the purposes of this section, "chief for a day program" means a program in which the Washington state patrol partners with other local, state, and federal law enforcement agencies, hospitals, and the community to provide a day of special attention to chronically ill children. Each child is selected and sponsored by a law enforcement agency. The event, chief for a day, may occur on the grounds and in the facilities of the Washington state patrol. The program may include any appropriate honoring of the child as a chief, such as a certificate swearing them in as a chief, a badge, a uniform, and donated gifts. The gifts may include, but are not limited to, games, puzzles, and art supplies.

[ 2010 c 10 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 10: "The legislature finds that the Washington state patrol's participation in charitable work, such as the chief for a day program that provides special attention to chronically ill children through recognition by various law enforcement agencies within the state, advances the overall purposes of the department by promoting positive relationships between law enforcement and the citizens of the state of Washington." [ 2010 c 10 s 1.]